District of Columbia statutes.
6-331.01

Relocation services for displaced persons and concerns; preference in vacancies in government housing; housing surveys.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to provide such relocation services as he shall determine to be reasonable and necessary to individuals, families, business concerns, and nonprofit organizations which may be or have been displaced from real property by actions of the United States or of the government of the District of Columbia, except the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency, such actions to include, but not be limited to, acquisition of property for public works projects, condemnation of unsafe and insanitary buildings, and enforcement of the laws and regulations relating to housing. The Mayor shall provide that such individuals and families so displaced shall be given the same preference with respect to vacancies occurring in housing owned or operated within the District of Columbia by federal or District of Columbia governmental agencies as is provided in § 6-301.07(b) [repealed]. The Mayor is authorized to make housing surveys in order to carry out this subchapter.

History

Oct. 6, 1964, 78 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 88-629, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-331.03 and § 42-3171.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-830.
1973 Ed., § 5-728.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Director of the Office of Property Management to Provide Relocation Assistance to Persons and Businesses Displaced by the District of Columbia’s Acquisition of Real Property through Condemnation by Eminent Domain or Threat Thereof, see Mayor’s Order 2004-196, December 2, 2004 ( 51 DCR 11376).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.